Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.635.110

Violations under RCW 28A.635.090 and 28A.635.100—Disciplinary authority exception.

The crimes defined in RCW 28A.635.090 and 28A.635.100 shall not apply to school administrators, teachers, or classified employees who are engaged in the reasonable exercise of their disciplinary authority.

[ 1990 c 33 s 542; 1988 c 2 s 3; 1971 c 45 s 5. Formerly RCW 28A.87.232.]